District of Columbia statutes.
28:4-111

Statute of limitations.

An action to enforce an obligation, duty, or right arising under this article must be commenced within 3 years after the cause of action accrues.

History

Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-249, § 2(e), 42 DCR 467

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28:4-111.

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

This section conforms to the period of limitations set by Section 3-118(g) for actions for breach of warranty and to enforce other obligations, duties or rights arising under Article 3. Bracketing “cause of action” recognizes that some states use a different term, such as “claim for relief.”